Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB662.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5558.1. Concurrent jurisdiction to prosecute.In addition to the authority conferred upon the Attorney General by the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act, the Attorney General shall have the authority to investigate and institute criminal proceedings for a felony offense under this subchapter if the Attorney General requests in writing to prosecute the felony offense under this subchapter in a criminal court or juvenile delinquency court and:(1) t he district attorney with jurisdiction over the prosecution of the felony offense accepts the request in 123456789101112131415161718 writing; or(2) all of the following occur:(i) the district attorney with jurisdiction over the prosecution of the felony offense fails to respond to the request within 90 days of the date of the request;(ii) the Attorney General sends a subsequent written request by certified or registered mail to the district attorney; and(iii) the district attorney fails to respond to the subsequent request within 10 days of the date of the subsequent request.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0662PN0686 - 2 - 123456789101112